src/phonology/sms-phon.twolc
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for ʒ"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used with  pääʹʒʒelm+N+Sg+Ill: päʹʒlma
!2016-05-10! ʒ:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!      u: (%{%ʹØ%}:) v:u (%{%ʹØ%}:ʹ) ʒ _  BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
!2016-05-10!      [Vow - u] (i|u) (%{%ʹØ%}:ʹ) ʒ _  BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^XYY2XY:|%^CC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!!! sauʒʒ+N+Pl+Nom __sheep/lammas__
!2016-05-10!!!€ sa%^1VOWuʒʒ%^V2VV%^XYY2XY
!2016-05-10!!!€ saauʒ000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!        Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) ʒ _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade  [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"ǯ:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10! ǯ:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!      Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|:ʹ) [ v: (%{%ʹØ%}:ʹ)|Cns:] ǯ _  BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:| %^XYY2VY: ] ;
!2016-05-10!!! kuʹvǯǯ+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ ku%^1VOWv0ǯǯ%^PAL%^XYY2XY
!2016-05-10!!!€ ku0uʹǯ000
!2016-05-10!        Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) ǯ _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade  [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:] ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"č:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10! č:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!        Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns: č _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade  [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:) [ (%{%ʹØ%}:)  Cns: | [u|i] (%{%ʹØ%}:) ] č: _ BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:)  (%{%ʹØ%}:) [h:|j:] (%{%ʹØ%}:) č:  _ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:) [ (%{%ʹØ%}:)  Cns: | [u|i] (%{%ʹØ%}:) ] č: _ Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:)  (%{%ʹØ%}:) [h:|j:] (%{%ʹØ%}:) č:  _ Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^XYY2VY: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"c:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10! c:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!        (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns: c _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade  [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:) [ (%{%ʹØ%}:)  Cns: | [u|i] (%{%ʹØ%}:) ] c: _ BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:)  (%{%ʹØ%}:) [h:|j:] (%{%ʹØ%}:) c:  _ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:) [ (%{%ʹØ%}:)  Cns: | [u|i] (%{%ʹØ%}:) ] c: _ Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!       Vow: (%^1VOW:)  (%{%ʹØ%}:) [h:|j:] (%{%ʹØ%}:) c:  _ Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^XYY2VY: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"ž:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10! ž:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!      Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns: ž _  BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns: ž _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade  [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"z:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10! z:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!      Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns: z _  BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!        (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns: z _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade  [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!      Vow: _ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^PenVow2a:) %^RmCns: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ ǩeâsttez%^PenVow2a%^RmCns
!2016-05-10!!!€ ǩeâstta000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for đ" 
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used with  ǩiđđ:ǩiiđ
!2016-05-10! đ:0 <=>
!2016-05-10! Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) đ: _    BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2C: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ ǩi%^1VOWđđ%^V2VV%^CC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ ǩiiđ000
!2016-05-10!     	 đ: _ Vow: Cns:  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ o%^1VOWđđâz%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC
!2016-05-10!!!€ oođ0âs00000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for r" 
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used with  võrr:võõr
!2016-05-10! r:0 <=>
!2016-05-10! Vow: (%^1VOW:) (i|u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) (Cns:)  r: (ˈ:) _    BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^CCC2C:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ võ%^1VOWrr%^V2VV%^CC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ võõr000
!2016-05-10!!!€ paarr%^CC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ paar00

!!€ j%{aä%}%{aäØ%}%{%ʼØ%}%{rØ%}r%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY
!!€ jääuʹ0r000

!2016-05-10! Vow: (%^1VOW:) (i|u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) r: (ˈ:) _  Vow: Cns:  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!2016-05-10!

"%{lØ%}:0 "
!! __@RULENAME@__ -
 Cx:Cy <=>
  NucleusAll (PostNucl) (CodaOnset:) _ (%{2ˈØ%}:) [Cns: |CodaVar:] BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^CC2C:|%^CCC2C:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
     where Cx in (%{bØ%} %{cØ%} %{čØ%} %{dØ%} %{đØ%} %{fØ%} %{gØ%} %{ǥØ%} %{gǧØ%} %{hØ%} %{jØ%} %{kØ%} %{lØ%} %{mØ%} %{ŋØ%} %{nØ%} %{pØ%} %{rØ%} %{tØ%} %{vØ%} %{ʒØ%} %{ǯØ%} )
           Cy in (0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0) matched ;
